Florida, session 2026, HB1201.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of section
385.207, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
385.207 Care and assistance of persons with epilepsy;
establishment of programs in epilepsy control.—
(2) The Department of Health shall:
(e) Institute and maintain an educational program among
physicians, hospitals, county health departments, and the public
concerning epilepsy, including the dissemination of information
and the conducting of educational programs concerning the
prevention of epilepsy and methods developed and used for the
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1201 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1201 2026 Legislature
care and treatment of persons with epilepsy. The educational
program must include the education and training requirements of
s. 1006.0626(3) and (5).
Section 2. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1), paragraph (b)
of subsection (2), and paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of
section 1006.0626, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection
(5) is added to that section, to read:
1006.0626 Care of students with epilepsy or seizure
disorders.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(c) "School" has the same meaning as in s. 1003.01(17) and
includes charter schools under s. 1002.33.
(2)
(b) An ISAP must be developed and signed by a medical
professional, in consultation with the student's parent, and
include the following:
1. Written orders from the student's medical professional,
in a form determined by the medical professional, outlining the
student's epilepsy or seizure disorder recommended care.
2. The parent's signature.
3. The student's epilepsy or seizure disorder symptoms.
4. Any accommodations the student requires for school
trips, after-school programs and activities, class parties, and
any other school-related activities.
5. When and whom to call for medical assistance.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1201 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1201 2026 Legislature
6. The student's ability to manage, and the student's
level of understanding of, his or her epilepsy or seizure
disorder.
7. How to maintain communication with the student; the
student's parent; and the student's health care team, school
nurse, and educational staff.
8. Any rescue medication prescribed by the student's
medical professional and how and when to administer the
medication.
(3) The school nurse or an appropriate school employee of
a school that receives an ISAP pursuant to subsection (2) shall:
(b) Verify that each school district or charter school
employee whose duties include regular contact with the student,
including any employee who teaches or transports the student to
and from school or school activities, has completed training in
the care of students with epilepsy and seizure disorders. The
training must include how to recognize the symptoms of and
provide care for epilepsy and seizure disorders. To assist
schools in meeting this requirement, the Department of Education
shall identify on its website one or more online training
courses that are provided by a nonprofit national organization
that supports the welfare of individuals with epilepsy and
seizure disorders and are available free of charge to schools.
The completion of training is valid for 5 years.
(5) Each school as defined in paragraph (1)(c) shall
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1201 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1201 2026 Legislature
display a poster developed by the department which describes the
basic steps of responding to an individual having a seizure. The
department shall identify one or more posters that are provided
by a national nonprofit organization that supports the welfare
of individuals with epilepsy and seizure disorders and are
available free of charge to schools.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1201 -01-er